Utah statutes.
67-8-2.   Salaries of judges established annually in appropriations act -- Bases of salaries.

(1)  The salaries of judges of courts of record shall be set annually by the Legislature in an appropriations act.

(2)  Judicial salaries shall be based upon the following percentages of the salary of a district court judge:

(a)  Juvenile Court judges				100%;

(b)  Court of Appeals judges				105%; and

(c)  associate justices of the Supreme Court		110%.



Amended by Chapter 198, 1996 General Session

